Georgia statutes. 
All boards of county commissioners, county commissioners, county managers, or other persons or bodies having charge of receipts and expenditures of county moneys shall publish a financial statement once each calendar year in the paper in which sheriff's advertisements are published in their respective counties. A copy of this statement shall also be posted twice each year for a period of not less than 30 days on the bulletin boards of the various county courthouses. The statement shall set forth the source of all income and a summary of all expenditures in a plain and simple manner that can be easily understood by all taxpaying citizens. The statement shall also contain a report of all money owed by the county, current bills excepted, of the number of tax delinquents, and the total amount of tax delinquency.

History

(Ga. L. 1952, p. 337, §§ 1, 2.)

Annotations

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Use of public funds to publish tax delinquent list approved. - Board of commissioners of a county can spend public funds to publish a list of delinquent taxpayers in the local newspaper. 1970 Op. Att'y Gen. No. U70-203.

RESEARCH REFERENCES

C.J.S. - 20 C.J.S., Counties, § 318.

36-1-7. Submission to grand jury of sworn returns of receipts and disbursements; approval or disapproval; appearance to explain errors; failure to make return.

Statute text

(a) The judges of the probate courts, county treasurers, clerks of the superior courts, and sheriffs of the various counties shall make a return, under oath, to the grand juries of their respective counties on the first day of each term of the superior court. The return shall set forth a just and true statement of the amount of money belonging to the county which was received by them and the source from which the money was received, along with their expenditures, accompanied by a copy of the most recent financial statement or annual audit of the financial affairs of the county offices subject to this Code section.

(b) When the returns provided for in subsection (a) of this Code section have been made, the grand jury shall examine the same. If the returns are found to be correct, the grand jury shall endorse its approval thereon and attach the same to its general presentments, to be filed in the office of the clerk of the superior court. If the returns are found to be incorrect, the grand jury, through its foreman, shall return them to the officer making the same, shall plainly and distinctly set forth in writing the grounds of its disapproval, and shall require the officer to appear before the jury and explain the errors.

(c) Should any officer fail or refuse to make the return required by subsection (a) of this Code section, the foreman of the grand jury shall immediately notify the presiding judge of such failure. The judge shall issue an order requiring the delinquent officer to come forward and make the return required or, in default thereof, to be attached for contempt.

History

(Ga. L. 1876, p. 13, §§ 1-3; Code 1882, §§ 508a, 508b, 508c; Civil Code 1895, §§ 364, 365, 366; Civil Code 1910, §§ 413, 414, 415; Code 1933, §§ 23-1201, 23-1202, 23-1203; Ga. L. 1996, p. 842, § 1.)

Annotations

Cross references. - Frequency with which grand jury must perform duties, § 15-12-71.

Cross references. - Accounting for public funds generally, T. 45, C. 8.

RESEARCH REFERENCES

Am. Jur. 2d. - 38 Am. Jur. 2d, Grand Jury, § 34 et seq. 63C Am. Jur. 2d, Public Officers and Employees, §§ 256 et seq., 340.

C.J.S. - 20 C.J.S., Counties, § 314 et seq. 38A C.J.S., Grand Juries, § 88 et seq.

36-1-8. Investment of certain tax proceeds in authorized bonds; registration of bonds.

Statute text

(a) The officer or officers charged with the administration of the fiscal affairs of the several counties and with the custody and control of such funds may invest all sums collected under the requirements of Article IX, Section V, Paragraph VI of the Constitution of this state, for the purpose of paying the principal of bonded indebtedness of such counties, which sums are not actually payable on the principal within 12 months from the date of collection thereof, in valid outstanding bonds of the county or some other county of the state which have been duly validated, or in valid outstanding bonds of this state or of the United States. Such officer or officers may keep the funds so invested in such bonds, with the privilege of changing the investment from the character of the bonds named to another from time to time as such officer or officers may direct until such time before the maturity of outstanding obligations as may be necessary to dispose of the bonds in order to meet such obligations at maturity.

(b) Whenever and as soon as the sinking fund of any county has been invested in the manner specified in subsection (a) of this Code section, the officer or officers of the county charged with the administration of the fiscal affairs of the county shall proceed forthwith to have the securities in which such funds are so invested registered in the name of the county, provided the bonds by their terms under the conditions of their issue are capable of being registered in the name of the owner.

History

(Ga. L. 1924, p. 86, §§ 1, 2; Code 1933, §§ 87-706, 87-707; Ga. L. 1983, p. 3, § 57.)

Annotations

Law reviews. - For note discussing and comparing the prudent man rule and the legal list rule in trustee investment, see 15 Mercer L. Rev. 530 (1964).

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

Requirements not absolute. - It must be observed that neither Ga. L. 1917, p. 199, § 1 (see now O.C.G.A. § 36-6-16) nor Ga. L. 1924, p. 86, §§ 1, 2 (see now O.C.G.A. § 36-1-8) makes their requirements absolute; county treasurers may follow the provisions of either of these statutes, and thereby become absolutely safe from loss, as well as making safe the public funds with which the treasurers are entrusted; however, it appears the county treasurer may keep the funds in the treasurer's possession so long as the county treasurer is prepared to pay them out when lawfully authorized and required so to do. Century Indem. Co. v. Fidelity & Deposit Co., 175 Ga. 834, 166 S.E. 235 (1932); Allen v. Henderson, 48 Ga. App. 74, 172 S.E. 94 (1933).

This section provides that funds collected for the purpose of payment of principal and interest of bonded indebtedness under the Constitution "may" be invested in valid outstanding bonds of such county or some other county of the state, which have been duly validated, or valid outstanding bonds of the State of Georgia or of the United States. Allen v. Henderson, 48 Ga. App. 74, 172 S.E. 94 (1933).

RESEARCH REFERENCES

Am. Jur. 2d. - 63C Am. Jur. 2d, Public Officers and Employees, §§ 256, 339 et seq.

36-1-9. Payment into county treasury.

Statute text

Any county official, officer, or employee who is charged with the responsibility of collecting, receiving, or disbursing any fees, fines, forfeitures, costs, commissions, allowances, penalties, funds, or moneys, or any other emolument or perquisite for any other county official, officer, or employee who has been placed upon a salary payable from county funds in lieu of receiving such compensation, when provision has been made by law for such compensation to become the property of and payable to the county, may pay said funds directly into the county treasury upon their receipt.

History

(Ga. L. 1964, p. 337, § 1; Ga. L. 1969, p. 3655, § 1; Ga. L. 1971, p. 3563, § 1; Ga. L. 1982, p. 2107, § 30; Ga. L. 1992, p. 1219, § 1.)

Annotations

RESEARCH REFERENCES

C.J.S. - 20 C.J.S., Counties, § 314 et seq.

36-1-10. Employment of accountant to examine books.

Statute text

The county governing authority is authorized, whenever it deems it necessary to do so, to employ an expert accountant to examine and report on the books, vouchers, and accounts of any county officer whose duty it is under the law to handle county funds. The expert accountant may reside in the county in which he is to be employed or elsewhere.

History

(Ga. L. 1901, p. 57, § 1; Civil Code 1910, § 418; Code 1933, § 23-1301.)

Annotations

Cross references. - Budgets and audits of counties and municipalities, T. 36, C. 81.

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

Section does not impair power of grand jury. - Sections 416, 417, and 418 of former Civil Code 1910 (see O.C.G.A. § 36-1-10) were not intended to and do not take away from the grand jury the grand jury's power to investigate, inspect, and examine the books and records of county officers, or, where the officers deem it necessary, to appoint one or more citizens of the county to do so, as prescribed by former Penal Code 1910, §§ 840 and 841. McLarty v. Fulton County, 52 Ga. App. 445, 183 S.E. 646 (1936).

Applicability of section to county having city of over 85,000. - Section 841 of Penal Code 1910 (see § 15-12-76 [repealed]) is valid and applies to counties having a city of more than 85,000, except that it does not authorize the appointment of expert accountants by the county commissioners or ordinary (now judge of the probate court), as the case may be, to examine the books and accounts of county officers, as by virtue of former Code 1910, §§ 416 through 418 (see now O.C.G.A. § 36-1-10). In such counties the clerk of the county commissioners is ex officio auditor and the clerk is required to make such examination whenever called on by the county commissioners. McLarty v. Fulton County, 52 Ga. App. 445, 183 S.E. 646 (1936).

Officer employed under section a public officer. - When a statute by implication authorizes the county commissioners to appoint an officer in and for a county, the action of the commissioners in so doing is done by the commissioners as an agency of the state. The relation between the county and the county attorney does not rest upon contract, but arises from appointment authorized by a legislative enactment. An individual who has a designation or title given the individual by law, and who exercises functions concerning the public assigned to the individual by law, is a public officer. Stelling v. Richmond County, 81 Ga. App. 571, 59 S.E.2d 414 (1950).

Residency requirement. - In the case of a county auditor, the residency requirement of former Code 1933, § 89-101(7) (see now O.C.G.A. § 15-6-59) was dispensed with by former Code 1933, § 23-1301 (see now O.C.G.A. § 36-1-10). However, the requirement that a county officer, whether elected or appointed, be a qualified voter remained absolute. Lester Witte & Co. v. Rabun County, 245 Ga. 382, 265 S.E.2d 4 (1980).

Cited in Watkins v. Tift, 177 Ga. 640, 170 S.E. 918 (1933); Booth v. Mitchell, 179 Ga. 522, 176 S.E. 396 (1934); Burke v. Wheeler County, 54 Ga. App. 81, 187 S.E. 246 (1936); Mathew v. Ellis, 214 Ga. 665, 107 S.E.2d 181 (1959).

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Accountant not a certified public accountant. - County commissioners are authorized to employ an accountant who is not a certified public accountant to audit county books. 1968 Op. Att'y Gen. No. 68-46.

RESEARCH REFERENCES

C.J.S. - 20 C.J.S., Counties, § 208 et seq.

36-1-11. Additional temporary personnel and equipment for assistance of county officers or departments.

Statute text

The governing authorities of the various counties shall have the authority to expend county funds for the purpose of employing such additional temporary personnel and providing such equipment and supplies as in their respective judgments shall be necessary and advisable, in order that such personnel and equipment might assist any county officer, official, or department in discharging his or its duties and responsibilities in an efficient and orderly fashion. Nothing contained within this Code section shall be construed so as to abrogate the authority of such officers and officials to select the personnel who shall be employed within their respective offices and departments.

History

(Ga. L. 1968, p. 447, § 1.)

Annotations

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

Authority to pay salary. - County commissioners can expend county funds for the limited purpose of paying salary of personnel to aid and assist in administration of county government. Whatley v. Taylor County, 224 Ga. 669, 164 S.E.2d 121 (1968).

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

County may employ additional personnel. - County is authorized to employ personnel to assist the tax assessors in maintaining the tax digest and the tax equalization program in the county. 1969 Op. Att'y Gen. No. 69-25.

Governing authority of a county may hire temporary personnel to assist the clerk of the superior court. 1969 Op. Att'y Gen. No. 69-400.

This section authorizes the county commissioners to employ a secretary for the sheriff on a temporary basis. Op. Att'y Gen. No. U71-11.

County may not pay salary to employee on fee basis. - Governing authority of a county is not authorized to pay the salary of a semipermanent employee of a county officer who is on a fee basis. 1969 Op. Att'y Gen. No. 69-478.

When compensation of deputy sheriff is fixed by a local Act, the county commissioners have no authority to increase the compensation. 1970 Op. Att'y Gen. No. U70-64.

RESEARCH REFERENCES

ALR. - Particular purposes within contemplation of statute authorizing issuance of bonds or use of funds by school district for specified purposes, 124 A.L.R. 883.

36-1-11.1. Expenditure of funds for insurance and employment benefits.

Statute text

(a) The governing authority of any county is authorized to provide, and to expend county funds for the provision of, group health, life, disability, and liability insurance, retirement or pension coverage, social security and employment security coverage, and other similar or related employment benefits for members of the county governing authority and for elected county officers and the personnel thereof, as well as for the dependents and beneficiaries of such officials and personnel; provided, however, that no member of a county governing authority may become vested in the provision of any retirement or pension benefits authorized by this subsection until after the next general election in which said official stands for reelection.

(b) Any prior expenditure of county funds in the manner authorized by this Code section is validated and confirmed; and no person shall be liable in any respect by reason of his or her participation in any prior provision of the benefits authorized by this Code section.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-1-11.1, enacted by Ga. L. 1989, p. 1284, § 1; Ga. L. 1995, p. 924, § 1; Ga. L. 1996, p. 1258, § 1.)

36-1-12. Courthouse to remain open during normal working hours.

Statute text

It shall be the duty and responsibility of the governing authority of each county of this state to keep the county courthouse and the county offices maintained therein open during normal working hours for the transaction of the public's business. As used in this Code section, "normal working hours" means a minimum of 40 working hours during each calendar week, except for those weeks during which public and legal holidays, which are recognized and designated as such by Georgia law or by the governing authority of the county, are observed.

History

(Code 1933, § 23-103, enacted by Ga. L. 1976, p. 1522, § 1.)

Annotations

Cross references. - Hours of operation of office of superior court clerk, § 15-6-93.

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

Courthouse and offices must be open for public's business. - Under this section it is not only the duty of the county commissioners to keep the courthouse building and county offices therein available, but it is also the commissioner's duty to see that county offices are open for the transaction of the public's business. Mobley v. Polk County, 242 Ga. 798, 251 S.E.2d 538 (1979).

Governing authority to determine hours. - Legislature has delegated to the governing authority the right to determine normal working hours with a minimum of 40 working hours during each week. Mobley v. Polk County, 242 Ga. 798, 251 S.E.2d 538 (1979).

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Applicability of section. - This section, in referring to "county offices", is intended to regulate the hours of only those offices over which the governing authority of the county exercises control. 1976 Op. Att'y Gen. No. U76-35 (see O.C.G.A. § 36-1-12).

36-1-13. Speculation in county orders by county officer.

Statute text

Any public officer of any county in this state who buys up at a discount or in any manner speculates in what are known as "county orders," "jury scrip," or any other order or scrip which is to be paid out of any public fund of this state or of any county in this state shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be removed from office.

History

(Ga. L. 1878-79, p. 79, § 1; Code 1882, § 4562g; Penal Code 1895, § 277; Penal Code 1910, § 281; Code 1933, §§ 23-9909, 23-1610.)

Annotations

RESEARCH REFERENCES

Am. Jur. 2d. - 63C Am. Jur. 2d, Public Officers and Employees, § 365.

36-1-14. Interested transactions prohibited; removal from office for violation.

Statute text

(a) No county governing authority, any member thereof, or any other county officer authorized by law to use public or county funds for the purchase of goods or property of any kind for public or county purposes shall purchase such goods or property from any store in which such county governing authority, any member thereof, or other county officer is an employee, or in which he is directly or indirectly interested, or from any person or partnership of which he is a member or by whom he is employed, unless by sanction of the majority of the members of the county governing authority or unless it is made clearly to appear that such individual, partnership, or owner of the store offers and will sell the goods or property as cheaply as or cheaper than the same can be bought elsewhere.

(b) Any county governing authority, any member thereof, or any county officer violating subsection (a) of this Code section shall be removed from office upon proper proceedings instituted by any taxpayer in the county. Any contract made in violation of subsection (a) of this Code section shall be illegal.

History

(Ga. L. 1898, p. 105, §§ 1, 2; Ga. L. 1899, p. 68, § 1; Ga. L. 1901, p. 81, § 1; Civil Code 1910, §§ 393, 394; Code 1933, §§ 23-1713, 23-1714.)

Annotations

Law reviews. - For article surveying important general legal principles of municipal and county government purchasing and contracting in Georgia, see 16 Mercer L. Rev. 371 (1965).

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

By its terms this section is of general application. Moore v. Whaley, 189 Ga. 647, 7 S.E.2d 394 (1940).

Section subject to qualification by special Act. - This section, so far as it refers to county commissioners, is subject to qualification by special Acts under Ga. Const. 1877, Art. XI, Sec. III, Para. I (see now Ga. Const. 1983, Art. IX, Sec. I, Para. I), and the special Acts need not be uniform. Robitzsch v. State, 189 Ga. 637, 7 S.E.2d 387 (1940); Moore v. Whaley, 189 Ga. 647, 7 S.E.2d 394 (1940).

Section not preempted by Georgia Constitution. - Georgia Const. 1976, Art. IX, Sec. I, Para. VIII (see now Ga. Const. 1983, Art. IX, Sec. I, Para. III), providing for removal of county officers for malpractice in office, does not preempt this section which prohibits use of county funds by county commissioners for purchases of goods or property in which the commissioners have an interest. Palmer v. Wilkins, 163 Ga. App. 104, 294 S.E.2d 355 (1982).

General Assembly had authority to effect a pro tanto repeal of the general law contained in this section, by making the provisions of this section inapplicable to the commissioners of a named county. Moore v. Whaley, 189 Ga. 647, 7 S.E.2d 394 (1940).

Not applicable to mere acceptance of order for payment. - This section does not apply to an acceptance of an order for payment submitted by a materialman on a contract for the building of a road. Eatonton Oil & Auto Co. v. Greene County, 53 Ga. App. 145, 185 S.E. 296 (1936).

Quo warranto is not the proper remedy for violation of this section. McDonough v. Bacon, 143 Ga. 283, 84 S.E. 588 (1915).

Due process requirement for proceedings. - Phrase "upon proper proceedings" used in subsection (b) implies that proceedings will be conducted in accordance with due process requirements, and it is not necessary to specify the exact procedure to be followed. Palmer v. Wilkins, 163 Ga. App. 104, 294 S.E.2d 355 (1982).

Commissioner's transfer of building, which benefitted county, did not require commissioner's removal. - Trial court properly harmonized Ga. L. 1983, pp. 4594, 4603, § 14, the Local Act creating the Miller County Board of Commissioners, and O.C.G.A. § 36-1-14 to find that a commissioner's actions in transferring a building the commissioner owned to the county, which benefitted the county at no cost to taxpayers, did not require the commissioner's removal. Richardson v. Phillips, 309 Ga. App. 773, 711 S.E.2d 358 (2011).

Sufficiency of evidence for summary judgment. - Evidence that the hauling fee paid to a county commissioner was the same as that which would have been paid to anyone else does not, on motion for summary judgment where all inferences are construed against the movant, satisfy the requirement that it shall clearly appear that the goods purchased were as cheap or cheaper than the goods could be bought elsewhere. Dalton Rock Prods. Co. v. Fannin County, 136 Ga. App. 649, 222 S.E.2d 93 (1975).

Claim for removal from office not rendered moot by the completion of the questioned transaction. - Taxpayer's claims seeking the removal of a county commissioner from office for violation of conflict of interest laws, Ga. Laws 1983, pp. 4594, 4603, § 14, and O.C.G.A. § 36-1-14, had never been determined; nor were the issues moot, although the transaction leading to the claims had been completed. Therefore, a trial court erred in dismissing the claims as moot. Richardson v. Phillips, 302 Ga. App. 305, 690 S.E.2d 918 (2010).

Ordinance not preempted by statute. - Miller County, Ga., Ordinance No. 10-01, § 3 could not be preempted by O.C.G.A. § 36-1-14 because § 3 did not impair the statute's operation but rather strengthened and augmented the statute; the exception in § 3 was more narrow than in O.C.G.A. § 36-1-14, requiring that a majority of the Board of Commissioners of Miller County approve the contract or transaction after establishing that the goods and the County had authority, as an incident of the county's home rule power, to amend Ga. L. 1983, p. 4594, § 14. Bd. of Comm'rs v. Callan, 290 Ga. 327, 720 S.E.2d 608 (2012).

Cited in Eatonton Oil & Auto Co. v. Greene County, 53 Ga. App. 145, 185 S.E. 296 (1936); Colonial Oil Co. v. United States Guarantee Co., 56 F. Supp. 545 (S.D. Ga. 1944).

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Purchase of insurance from wife. - County board of education may purchase insurance from the wife of a member of the board when there is no direct or indirect benefit gained by the member. 1960-61 Op. Att'y Gen. p. 158.

RESEARCH REFERENCES

Am. Jur. 2d. - 63C Am. Jur. 2d, Public Officers and Employees, §§ 169 et seq., 181 et seq., 194, 371.

C.J.S. - 67 C.J.S., Officers and Public Employees, §§ 347, 348, 349.

ALR. - Relation as creditor of contracting party as constituting interest within statute or rule of common law against public officer being interested in contract with the public, 73 A.L.R. 1352.

Relationship as disqualifying interest within statute making it unlawful for an officer to be interested in a public contract, 74 A.L.R. 792.

Public officer's relation to corporation as officer or stockholder as constituting interest within statute or rule of common law against public officer being interested in contract with public, 140 A.L.R. 344.

36-1-15. Prohibition, regulation, and taxation of fortunetelling and similar practices.

Statute text

The county governing authority may by proper ordinance prohibit, regulate, or tax the practice of fortunetelling, phrenology, astrology, clairvoyance, palmistry, or other kindred practices, businesses, or professions where a charge is made or a donation accepted for the services and where the practice is carried on outside the corporate limits of the municipality. The tax, if any, which is imposed shall not exceed the sum of $1,000.00 per year. Such ordinances may prescribe the punishment to be imposed for violations, but such punishment shall not exceed imprisonment for 60 days or a fine of $500.00 or both. Prosecutions for violations shall be in the magistrate court of the county as provided in Chapter 10 of Title 15.

History

(Ga. L. 1953, Nov.-Dec. Sess., p. 311, § 1; Ga. L. 1984, p. 505, § 1.)

Annotations

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

City ordinance presumed valid. - Presumption in favor of the validity of a city ordinance is not overcome in a case involving a constitutional attack thereon when it is merely assumed that the practice of fortunetelling is a legitimate calling which cannot be prohibited by the city under the city's police power. Williams v. Jenkins, 211 Ga. 10, 83 S.E.2d 614 (1954).

RESEARCH REFERENCES

Am. Jur. 2d. - 36 Am. Jur. 2d, Fortunetelling, § 1 et seq.

C.J.S. - 16A C.J.S., Constitutional Law, §§ 777 et seq., 839, 851 et seq., 906 et seq.

ALR. - Validity of license tax or fee on show or place of amusement, 111 A.L.R. 778.

Regulation of astrology, clairvoyancy, fortunetelling, and the like, 91 A.L.R.3d 766.

36-1-16. Garbage, trash, waste, or refuse not to be transported across state or county boundaries for dumping without permission; exemption.

Statute text

(a) No person, firm, corporation, or employee of any municipality shall transport, pursuant to a contract, whether oral or otherwise, garbage, trash, waste, or refuse across state or county boundaries for the purpose of dumping the same at a publicly or privately owned dump, unless permission is first obtained from the governing authority of the county in which the dump is located and from the governing authority of the county in which the garbage, trash, waste, or refuse is collected.

(b) Subsection (a) of this Code section shall not apply to the transportation of any material which is regulated pursuant to Article 2 of Chapter 5 of Title 12, the "Georgia Water Quality Control Act," or Article 1 of Chapter 9 of Title 12, "The Georgia Air Quality Act."

History

(Ga. L. 1971, p. 445, § 1; Ga. L. 1978, p. 1911, § 1; Ga. L. 1990, p. 1345, § 1; Ga. L. 1992, p. 918, § 3; Ga. L. 1993, p. 91, § 36.)

Annotations

Cross references. - Solid waste handling, disposal, generally, T. 12, C. 8.

Law reviews. - For survey article on local government law, see 59 Mercer L. Rev. 285 (2007) and 60 Mercer L. Rev. 262 (2008). For survey article on zoning and land use law, see 59 Mercer L. Rev. 493 (2007) and 60 Mercer L. Rev. 457 (2008).

For note on 1992 amendment of this Code section, see 9 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 186 (1992).

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

Constitutionality. - O.C.G.A. § 36-1-16 is constitutional, and the statute gives Georgia counties a role in protecting the public health and welfare with respect to the operation of waste dumps within the counties' respective boundaries. Diamond Waste, Inc. v. Monroe County, 939 F.2d 941 (11th Cir. 1991).

O.C.G.A. § 36-1-16(a) is unconstitutional because the statute impairs interstate commerce by improperly giving Georgia counties the power to veto the importation of solid waste. Fulton County v. City of Atlanta, 280 Ga. 353, 629 S.E.2d 196 (2006).

Unconstitutional application. - County's application of O.C.G.A. § 36-1-16 to prohibit a waste management company from operating a landfill, which was owned by a municipality but located in the county, as a regional landfill, i.e., from receiving waste from outside the county and from outside the state, violated the company's constitutional commerce clause right to engage in interstate commerce without discriminatory intervention. Diamond Waste, Inc. v. Monroe County, 731 F. Supp. 505 (M.D. Ga. 1990), aff'd in part, vacated in part on other grounds, 939 F.2d 941 (11th Cir. 1991).

County resolution preventing a waste management firm from importing waste of any kind into the county from other counties and other locations violated the commerce clause of the federal constitution. Diamond Waste, Inc. v. Monroe County, 939 F.2d 941 (11th Cir. 1991).

Judgments from federal court binding on state court during appeal. - Since simultaneous actions challenging the constitutionality of O.C.G.A. § 36-1-16 were pending in state and federal court, and an appeal from the federal district court order was pending, estoppel by judgment precluded state court consideration of the matter on appeal because judgments from a federal court remain binding during the pendency of an appeal. Mayor of Forsyth v. Monroe County, 260 Ga. 296, 392 S.E.2d 865 (1990).

RESEARCH REFERENCES

ALR. - Validity of statutory or municipal regulations as to garbage, 72 A.L.R. 520; 135 A.L.R. 1305.

Regulation and licensing of private garbage or rubbish removal services, 83 A.L.R.2d 799.

36-1-17. Authority of county employees to issue citations for violation of ordinances and regulations in counties having population of 550,000 or more; jurisdiction; effect of failure to respond.

Statute text

In all counties of this state having a population of 550,000 or more according to the United States decennial census of 1980 or any future such census, any employee who is authorized to enforce any county code, ordinance, regulation, rule, or other order, including such related ordinances, codes, and regulations as drainage regulations, soil erosion and sedimentation control regulations, subdivision and zoning regulations, water and sewer regulations, and any other land development or construction regulations of such counties, shall have the authority to issue citations to any person who shall violate any such county code, ordinance, regulation, or order which shall be in effect in such counties. Such citations shall command the appearance of such person at a designated regular session of a court in such county having the jurisdiction of a commitment court throughout the entire county. At such time and place, the court shall act as a court of inquiry with all the powers and authorities specified in Article 2 of Chapter 7 of Title 17. In the event that any such person shall fail to appear in response to such citation, a warrant shall be issued for the arrest of the person for violation of such county code, ordinance, regulation, rule, or order without the necessity of any further action.

History

(Ga. L. 1981, p. 3261, § 1.)

Annotations

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Probate court jurisdiction over violations of county ordinances. - Probate court has jurisdiction over violations of county ordinances in counties of 550,000 or more pursuant to O.C.G.A. § 36-1-17. 1995 Op. Att'y Gen. No. U95-1.

36-1-18. Authority of counties having population of 550,000 or more to assess against cost of repairing streets as necessitated by private construction activity; liens.

Statute text

(a) In all counties of this state having a population of 550,000 or more according to the United States decennial census of 1980 or any future such census, the county governing authority shall be empowered by ordinance or resolution to assess against any property the cost of reopening or repairing any public way, street, road, right of way, or highway, or the cost of cleaning up from any public way, street, road, right of way, or highway any debris, dirt, sediment, soil, trash, building materials, and other physical materials originating on such property, as a result of any private construction activity carried on by any developer, contractor, subcontractor, or owner of such property.

(b) Any assessment authorized under subsection (a) of this Code section, as well as the interest thereon and the expense of collection, shall be a lien against the property so assessed coequal with the lien of other taxes and shall be enforced in the same manner as are state and county ad valorem property taxes by issuance of a fi. fa. and levy and sale as set forth in Title 48, the "Georgia Public Revenue Code."

History

(Ga. L. 1981, p. 3259, §§ 1, 2.)

36-1-19. Appropriation for charitable grants or contributions in counties having population greater than 550,000; establishment of boards or councils to devise procedures and advise governing authority.

Statute text

Reserved. Repealed by Ga. L. 1996, p. 1415, § 1, effective July 1, 1996.

Annotations

Editor's notes. - This Code section was based on Ga. L. 1980, p. 3406, §§ 1, 2; Ga. L. 1982, p. 2107, § 31.

36-1-19.1. Appropriations for charitable grants or contributions in counties having population of 400,000 or more; boards or councils to establish procedures and advise governing authorities.

Statute text

(a) In all counties of this state having a population of 400,000 or more according to the United States decennial census of 1990 or any future such census, the governing authorities of such counties are authorized to provide by ordinance for the appropriation of money for and the making of grants or contributions to any corporation, association, institution, or individual for purely charitable purposes, provided that the activities funded by any such grants or contributions shall take place within the county making such grant or contribution.

(b) In connection with the appropriation of money for or the making of any grant or contribution for purely charitable purposes, the governing authority of any county within this state may establish such boards or councils as it may determine to establish the procedures by which such grants or contributions are made and to advise the governing authorities of such counties generally with respect to such grants or contributions.

(c) Appropriations, grants, and contributions made pursuant to this Code section shall be in the form of contracts for services.

(d) For the purpose of this Code section, "purely charitable purposes" shall mean charitable, benevolent, or philanthropic purposes for health, education, social welfare, arts and humanities, or environmental organizations.

(e) No funds may be appropriated, granted, or contributed under this Code section for a purpose which is in violation of the laws of this state; provided, however, that this subsection shall not be interpreted to prohibit a good faith expenditure of funds for purposes authorized by law.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-1-19.1, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 1415, § 2; Ga. L. 1999, p. 81, § 36.)

36-1-20. Ordinances for governing and policing of unincorporated areas of county.

Statute text

(a) The governing authority of each county, for the purpose of protecting and preserving the public health, safety, and welfare, is authorized to adopt ordinances for the governing and policing of the unincorporated areas of the county, violations of which ordinances may be punished by fine or imprisonment or both. Without limiting the generality of the foregoing, such ordinances may provide for traffic regulation, including adoption of the uniform rules of the road under Chapter 6 of Title 40, may provide for the regulation and control of litter in the same manner as municipal ordinances under Code Section 16-7-48, and may provide for the implementation and enforcement of any power or duty vested in the county governing authority.

(b) Each such ordinance shall specify the maximum punishment which may be imposed for a violation of the ordinance; and in no case shall the maximum punishment for the violation of any such ordinance exceed a fine of $1,000.00 or imprisonment for 60 days or both; provided, however, that for violation of a pretreatment standard or requirement adopted pursuant to the federal Clean Water Act the ordinance may specify that the fine may be up to $1,000.00 per day for each violation by an industrial user.

(c) Jurisdiction over violations of such county ordinances shall be in the magistrate court of the county; and procedure for enforcement of such ordinances shall be as provided in Article 4 of Chapter 10 of Title 15; provided, however, jurisdiction over ordinances having to do with traffic offenses shall be in the court or courts having jurisdiction over state traffic offenses.

(d) This Code section shall not affect the jurisdiction of or procedure in any other court which has jurisdiction over violations of county ordinances.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-1-20, enacted by Ga. L. 1984, p. 1086, § 1; Ga. L. 1990, p. 1345, § 2; Ga. L. 1991, p. 993, § 1.)

Annotations

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

Cited in Kariuki v. DeKalb County, 253 Ga. 713, 324 S.E.2d 450 (1985); Curves, LLC v. Spalding County, Georgia, 569 F. Supp. 2d 1305 (N.D. Ga. 2007).

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Jurisdiction over offense of open container of alcohol in vehicle. - In counties in which there is a state court, both the state court and the magistrate court of the county possess concurrent jurisdiction over the prosecution of individuals charged with violating a county ordinance prohibiting the possession of open containers of alcohol while operating a motor vehicle. 1992 Op. Att'y Gen. No. U92-3.

Regulation of trucks on residential roads. - County sheriff's department may enforce ordinances prohibiting trucks over ten wheels from using residential roads within county except when making temporary deliveries. 1996 Op. Att'y Gen. No. U96-17.

Traffic control ordinances. - Counties may enact ordinances regarding enforcement of traffic control devices by the use of cameras. 2000 Op. Att'y Gen. No. U2000-12.

36-1-21. Civil service system for county employees.

Statute text

(a) The governing authority of any county is authorized to provide by ordinance or resolution for the creation of a civil service system for employees of the county, other than elected officials or persons appointed to positions for specified terms.

(b) Subsequent to the creation of a civil service system, the county governing authority which created the system may provide by ordinance or resolution that positions of employment within departments subject to the jurisdiction of elected county officers or subject to the jurisdiction of other commissions, boards, or bodies of the county shall be subject to and covered by the civil service system upon the written application of the elected county officer, commission, board, or body having the power of appointment, employment, or removal of employees of the officer, department, commission, board, or body. Once positions of employment are made subject to the civil service system, such positions shall not be removed thereafter from the coverage of the civil service system.

(c) A civil service system created pursuant to the authority of this Code section shall be administered in such manner and pursuant to such rules and regulations as may be provided for by resolution or ordinance of the county governing authority which created the system.

(d) (1) The powers granted to the governing authorities of counties by this Code section:

(A) Shall not supersede or replace any power granted by any local constitutional amendment to the General Assembly to provide by law for a civil service or merit system for any county;

(B) Shall not supersede or replace any law enacted by the General Assembly pursuant to the authority of a local constitutional amendment described in subparagraph (A) of this paragraph; and

(C) Shall be in addition to any power granted by local constitutional amendment directly to the governing authority of any county to provide by ordinance or resolution for a civil service or merit system for such county.
